Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1349
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that elemental mercury is a persistent and toxic pollutant that accumulates in the environment. The Legislature further finds that each year elemental mercury contained in liquid mercury thermometers can enter the environment and result in human exposure to elemental mercury through accidental spills, breakage, and releases. It is the intent of the Legislature to ban the sale and distribution of liquid mercury thermometers containing elemental mercury to prevent further accidental exposure.

Laws 2003, LB 17, § 3.